espeak-data/dictsource/ja_rules
// This file is UTF8 encoded

.L01 ア カ ガ サ ザ タ ダ ナ ハ バ パ マ ヤ ラ ワ ァ ャ
.L02 イ キ ギ シ ジ チ ジ ニ ヒ ビ ピ ミ リ ヰ ィ
.L03 ウ ク グ ス ズ ツ ヅ ヌ フ ブ プ ム ユ ル ゥ ュ
.L04 エ ケ ゲ セ ぜ テ デ ネ ヘ ベ ペ メ レ ヱ ェ
.L05 オ コ ゴ ソ ゾ ト ド ノ ホ ボ ポ モ ヨ ロ ヲ ォ ョ

.L06 ア イ ウ エ オ
.L07 カ キ ク ケ コ
.L08 ガ ギ グ ゲ ゴ
.L09 サ シ ス セ ソ
.L10 ザ ジ ズ ぜ ゾ
.L11 タ       テ ト
.L12    チ ツ
.L13 ダ       デ ド
.L14    ヅ ヅ
.L15 ナ ニ ヌ ネ ノ
.L16 ハ ヒ    ヘ ホ
.L17       フ
.L18 バ ビ ブ ベ ボ
.L19 パ ピ プ ペ ポ
.L20 マ ミ ム メ モ
.L21 ヤ    ユ    ヨ
.L22 ラ リ ル レ ロ
.L23 ワ          ヲ

.replace
// full-width hiragana
 あ ア
 い イ
 う ウ
 え エ
 お オ
 か カ
 き キ
 く ク
 け ケ
 こ コ
 が ガ
 ぎ ギ
 ぐ グ
 げ ゲ
 ご ゴ
 さ サ
 し シ
 す ス
 せ セ
 そ ソ
 ざ ザ
 じ ジ
 ず ズ
 ぜ ゼ
 ぞ ゾ
 た タ
 ち チ
 つ ツ
 て テ
 と ト
 だ ダ
 ぢ ヂ
 づ ヅ
 で デ
 ど ド
 な ナ
 に ニ
 ぬ ヌ
 ね ネ
 の ノ
 は ハ
 ひ ヒ
 ふ フ
 へ ヘ
 ほ ホ
 ば バ
 び ビ
 ぶ ブ
 べ ベ
 ぼ ボ
 ぱ パ
 ぴ ピ
 ぷ プ
 ぺ ペ
 ぽ ポ
 ま マ
 み ミ
 む ム
 め メ
 も モ
 や ヤ
 ゆ ユ
 よ ヨ
 ら ラ
 り リ
 る ル
 れ レ
 ろ ロ
 わ ワ
 ゐ ヰ
 を ヲ
 ゑ ヱ
 ん ン

 ぁ ァ
 ぃ ィ
 ぅ ゥ
 ぇ ェ
 ぉ ォ
 っ ッ
 ゃ ャ
 ゅ ュ
 ょ ョ

// half-width hiragana
// TODO
// half-width katakana
// TODO

.group ア
       ア      a

.group イ
       イ      i
       イェ    je

.group ウ
       ウ      u
       ウェ    we

.group ヴ
       ヴ      vu
       ヴァ    va
       ヴィ    vi
       ヴェ    ve
       ヴォ    vo

.group エ
       エ      e

.group オ
       オ      o

.group カ
       カ      ka

.group キ
       キ      ki
       キャ    kja
       キュ    kju
       キョ    kjo

.group ク
       ク      ku

.group ケ
       ケ      ke

.group コ
       コ      ko

.group ガ
       ガ      ga

.group ギ
       ギ      gi
       ギャ    gja
       ギュ    gju
       ギョ    gjo

.group グ
       グ      gu

.group ゲ
       ゲ      ge

.group ゴ
       ゴ      go

.group サ
       サ      sa

.group シ
       シ      si
       シャ    sja
       シュ    sju
       ショ    sjo

.group ス
       ス      su

.group セ
       セ      se

.group ソ
       ソ      so

.group ザ
       ザ      za

.group ジ
       ジ      zi
       ジャ    zja
       ジュ    zju
       ジョ    zjo

.group ズ
       ズ      zu

.group ゼ
       ゼ      ze

.group ゾ
       ゾ      zo

.group タ
       タ      ta

.group チ
       チ      tsi
       チャ    tsja
       チュ    tsju
       チョ    tsjo

.group ツ
       ツ      tsu

.group テ
       テ      te
       ティ    ti

.group ト
       ト      to

.group ダ
       ダ      da

.group ヂ
       ヂ      dz\i
       ヂャ    dz\ja
       ヂュ    dz\ju
       ヂョ    dz\jo

.group ヅ
       ヅ      dzu

.group デ
       デ      de
       ディ    di

.group ド
       ド      do

.group ナ
       ナ      na

.group ニ
       ニ      ni
       ニャ    dz\ja
       ニュ    dz\ju
       ニョ    dz\jo

.group ヌ
       ヌ      nu

.group ネ
       ネ      ne

.group ノ
       ノ      no

.group ハ
       ハ      ha
       ハ (_   wa

.group ヒ
       ヒ      Ci
       ヒャ    Cja
       ヒュ    Cju
       ヒョ    Cjo

.group フ
       フ      fu

.group ヘ
       ヘ      he

.group バ
       バ      ba

.group ビ
       ビ      bi
       ビャ    bja
       ビュ    bju
       ビョ    bjo

.group ブ
       ブ      bu

.group ベ
       ベ      be

.group ボ
       ボ      bo

.group パ
       パ      pa

.group ピ
       ピ      pi
       ピャ    pja
       ピュ    pju
       ピョ    pjo

.group プ
       プ      pu

.group ペ
       ペ      pe

.group ポ
       ポ      po

.group マ
       マ      ma

.group ミ
       ミ      mi
       ミャ    mja
       ミュ    mju
       ミョ    mjo

.group ム
       ム      mu

.group メ
       メ      me

.group モ
       モ      mo

.group ヤ
       ヤ      ja

.group ユ
       ユ      ju

.group ヨ
       ヨ      jo

.group ラ
       ラ      ra

.group リ
       リ      ri
       リャ    rja
       リュ    rju
       リョ    rjo

.group ル
       ル      ru

.group レ
       レ      re

.group ロ
       ロ      ro

.group ワ
       ワ      wa

.group ヰ
       ヰ      i

.group ヲ
       ヲ      wo

.group ン
       ン      N

.group ッ
       ッ (L07 k
       ッ (L08 g
       ッ (L09 s
       ッ (L10 z
       ッ (L11 t
       ッ (L12 ts
       ッ (L13 d
       ッ (L14 dz
       ッ (L15 n
       ッ (L16 h
       ッ (L17 f
       ッ (L18 b
       ッ (L19 p
       ッ (L20 m
       ッ (L21 j // ??
       ッ (L22 r
       ッ (L23 w // ??

.group ー
  L01) ー      a
  L02) ー      i
  L03) ー      u
  L04) ー      e
  L05) ー      o

.group
       .
       ː
